North Dakota statutes. TITLE 47 Property
CHAPTER 47-32 Eviction

47-32-01.
When eviction maintainable.

An action of eviction to recover the possession of real estate is maintainable in the proper district court when:

A party, by force, intimidation, fraud, or stealth, has entered upon the prior actual possession of real property of another and detains the same.

A party, after peaceably entering upon real property, turns out by force, threats, or menacing conduct the party in possession.

A party, by force or by menaces and threats of violence, unlawfully holds and keeps the possession of any real property, whether the possession was acquired peaceably or otherwise.

A lessee, in person or by subtenant, holds over after the termination of the lease or expiration of the lessee’s term, or fails to pay rent for three days after the rent is due.

A party continues in possession after a sale of the real property under mortgage, execution, order, or any judicial process and after the expiration of the time fixed by law for redemption, or after the execution and delivery of a deed, or after the cancellation and termination of any contract for deed, bond for deed, or other instrument for the future conveyance of real estate or equity in the real estate.

A party continues wrongfully in possession after a judgment in partition or after a sale under an order or decree of a district court.

A lessee or a person on the premises with the lessee’s consent acts in a manner that unreasonably disturbs other tenants’ peaceful enjoyment of the premises.

The lessee violates a material term of the written lease agreement between the lessor and lessee.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 4.

47-32-02.
Appearance — Notice of intention to evict — When required — When and how served.

In any action for eviction the time specified in the summons for the appearance of the defendant may not be fewer than three nor more than fifteen days from the date on which the summons is issued. If the person cannot be found in the county, of which the return of the sheriff or process server is prima facie proof, and service has been attempted at least once between the hours of six p.m. and ten p.m. upon the filing of an affidavit of the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney stating that the defendant cannot be found or on belief that the defendant is not in this state and a copy of the summons has been mailed to the defendant at the defendant’s last-known address if any is known to the plaintiff, service of the summons may be made upon the defendant by the sheriff or process server posting the summons upon the door of the residential unit. In all cases arising under subsections 4, 5, 6, and 8 of section 47-32-01, three days’ written notice of intention to evict must be given to the lessee, subtenant, or party in possession, before proceedings can be instituted. The notice may be served and returned as a summons is served and returned or, if the party cannot be found, then by the sheriff of the county or a process server posting the notice conspicuously upon the premises. Service by delivery of a copy of the summons to the defendant in person within the county must be made at least three days before the time fixed for the appearance of the defendant. Service elsewhere or personal service in any other mode must be made at least seven days before the time fixed for the appearance of the defendant.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 4.

47-32-03.
Legal representatives may bring eviction actions.

Executors and administrators may bring actions of eviction in the district courts in the same manner as their testators and intestates, as the case may be.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 4.

47-32-04.
Eviction actions not joinable with other actions — Exception — When counterclaims only interposable.

An action of eviction cannot be brought in a district court in connection with any other action, except for rents and profits accrued or for damages arising by reason of the defendant’s possession. No counterclaim can be interposed in such action, except as a setoff to a demand made for damages or for rents and profits. If the court finds for the plaintiff in the action, the court shall enter judgment that the plaintiff have immediate restitution of the premises. Upon a showing by the defendant that immediate restitution of the premises would work a substantial hardship on the defendant or the defendant’s family, except in cases in which the eviction judgment is based in whole or in part on a disturbance of the peace, the court may stay the special execution for a reasonable period, not to exceed five days.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 65, § 4.